Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1108.53
Original capitol furniture; repaired; maintained; assignment.

All original capitol furniture shall be repaired and maintained by the Office of the Nebraska Capitol Commission and shall be made available to occupants of the State Capitol. Assignment of original furniture shall be made at the discretion of the State Capitol Administrator. The original furniture shall remain in the State Capitol at all times. Any agency that is relocated from the State Capitol shall make other provision for its furniture needs, and original furniture currently being used by such agency shall be eligible for reassignment by the administrator.

Laws 1980, LB 885, § 6;

Laws 2004, LB 439, § 30.